dev/total.zh.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>

<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="percent" c="percent"/>
<sdef n="predet" c="predet"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="post" c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="part" c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="cnj" c="Conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
                    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
            <sdef n="vblexestar" /> 
                <sdef n="n"/>
                 <sdef n="mf"/>
                <sdef n="neg"/>
		<sdef n="np"/>
	   <sdef n="vblex"/>
           <sdef n="vbmod"/>
       <sdef n="vbser"/>
	   <sdef n="adj"/>
	   <sdef n="part"/>
	   <sdef n="count"/>
	   <sdef n="sg"/>
	   <sdef n="pl"/>
	   <sdef n="prn"/>
       <sdef n="num"/>
		<sdef n="det"/>
		<sdef n="pr"/>
		<sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
		<sdef n="cnjca"/>
                <sdef n="cm"/>
		<sdef n="adv"/>
		<sdef n="cnjadv"/>
        		<sdef n="sent"/>
            		<sdef n="qt"/>
            		<sdef n="qst"/>



  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
   <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
           </pardef>	 

    
         <pardef n="coma">	 
             <e><p><l>，</l><r>，<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>	  
           </pardef>	 
           <pardef n="separa">	 
            <e><re>[。！：？]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>	 
           </pardef>
		
		
		<pardef n="我__prn">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="prn"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
        <pardef n="个__num">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="num"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="并且__cnjcoo">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
        <pardef n="x__cnjcoo">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
		
			<pardef n="并且__cnjadv"> <!--Porque-->
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="爱人__n">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="n"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
				<pardef n="爱人__np">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="np"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>

		
		<pardef n="是__vbser">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vbser"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
                
                
                <pardef n="正在__vblexestar">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vblexestar"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
		</pardef>

         <pardef n="可以__vbmod">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vbmod"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
                </pardef>
                
                
                <pardef n="不能__vbmodneg">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="neg"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
                </pardef>

        
        <pardef n="爱__vblex">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
        
                <pardef n="找不到__vblexneg">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
               

	 
	<pardef n="这__det">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="det"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
	<pardef n="x__det">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="det"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
	
	
	<pardef n="以上__pr">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="pr"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="暗暗__adv">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="adv"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
	</pardef>
    <pardef n="平__adv">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="adv"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="平__adj">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="adj"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
	</pardef>
                
       <pardef n="大__adj">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="adj"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
	</pardef>
                
       
       
	<pardef n="吗__qt">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="qst"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
	</pardef>
    <pardef n="x__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__part">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__predet">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="predet"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__cnj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

		<e lm="她"><i>她</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
	        <e lm="大"><i>大</i><par n="大__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="因为"><i>因为</i><par n="并且__cnjadv"/></e>
		<e lm="正在"><i>正在</i><par n="正在__vblexestar"/></e>
		<e lm="吗"><i>吗</i><par n="吗__qt"/></e>
                <e lm="呢"><i>呢</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
               <e lm="当"><i>当</i><par n="并且__cnjadv"/></e>
        <e lm="不会"><i>不会</i><par n="不能__vbmodneg"/></e>
          <e lm="啦"><i>啦</i><par n="吗__qt"/></e>
     <e lm="时"><i>时</i><par n="并且__cnjadv"/></e>
              <e lm="可以"><i>可以</i><par n="可以__vbmod"/></e>
             <e lm="啊"><i>啊</i><par n="吗__qt"/></e>
            <e lm="虽然"><i>虽然</i><par n="并且__cnjadv"/></e>
          <e lm="找不到"><i>找不到</i><par n="找不到__vblexneg"/></e>
           <e lm="传"><i>传</i><par n="以上__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="难道"><i>难道</i><par n="可以__vbmod"/></e>
        <e lm="开心"><i>开心</i><par n="大__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="能"><i>能</i><par n="可以__vbmod"/></e>
        <e lm="一起"><i>一起</i><par n="平__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="不能"><i>不能</i><par n="不能__vbmodneg"/></e>
       <e lm="哦"><i>哦</i><par n="吗__qt"/></e>
	 <e lm="可是"><i>可是</i><par n="并且__cnjcoo"/></e>
		<e lm="是"><i>是</i><par n="是__vbser"/></e>
		<e lm="长"><i>长</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="三"><i>三</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="两"><i>两</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="五"><i>五</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="从"><i>从</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="六"><i>六</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="到"><i>到</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="吗"><i>吗</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="呀"><i>呀</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="啊"><i>啊</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="喂"><i>喂</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="四"><i>四</i><par n="x__num"/></e>
    <e lm="在"><i>在</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="早"><i>早</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="短"><i>短</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="种"><i>种</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="过"><i>过</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="遍"><i>遍</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="间"><i>间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="不同"><i>不同</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="中间"><i>中间</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="丰富"><i>丰富</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="他们"><i>他们</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="以前"><i>以前</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="以后"><i>以后</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="但是"><i>但是</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="便宜"><i>便宜</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="出去"><i>出去</i><par n="x__part"/></e>
    <e lm="分之"><i>分之</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="十分"><i>十分</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="周围"><i>周围</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="回来"><i>回来</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="因为"><i>因为</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="她们"><i>她们</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="年轻"><i>年轻</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="忽然"><i>忽然</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="情况"><i>情况</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="所以"><i>所以</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="提高"><i>提高</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="欢迎"><i>欢迎</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="注意"><i>注意</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
    <e lm="突然"><i>突然</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="虽然"><i>虽然</i><par n="x__cnj"/></e>
    <e lm="辅导"><i>辅导</i><par n="x__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="辛苦"><i>辛苦</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="那个"><i>那个</i><par n="x__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="一下儿"><i>一下儿</i><par n="x__post"/></e>
    <e lm="一点儿"><i>一点儿</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="没关系"><i>没关系</i><par n="x__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="从...到..."><i>从...到...</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
<e lm="12"><i>12</i><par n="个__num"/></e>
<e lm="28"><i>28</i><par n="个__num"/></e>
<e lm="一切"><i>一切</i><par n="这__det"/></e>
<e lm="七百多"><i>七百多</i><par n="个__num"/></e>
<e lm="与其"><i>与其</i><par n="并且__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="个人"><i>个人</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
<e lm="二十四"><i>二十四</i><par n="个__num"/></e>
<e lm="从小"><i>从小</i><par n="暗暗__adv"/></e>
<e lm="他"><i>他</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="以"><i>以</i><par n="x__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="以至"><i>以至</i><par n="并且__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="何地"><i>何地</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="作为"><i>作为</i><par n="以上__pr"/></e>
<e lm="借用"><i>借用</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="克尔"><i>克尔</i><par n="爱人__np"/></e>
<e lm="全"><i>全</i><par n="这__det"/></e>
<e lm="六十二"><i>六十二</i><par n="个__num"/></e>
<e lm="共用"><i>共用</i><par n="平__adj"/></e>
<e lm="其余"><i>其余</i><par n="这__det"/></e>
<e lm="出入"><i>出入</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
<e lm="另"><i>另</i><par n="这__det"/></e>
<e lm="司法独立"><i>司法独立</i><par n="爱人__np"/></e>
<e lm="同人"><i>同人</i><par n="暗暗__adv"/></e>
<e lm="和"><i>和</i><par n="并且__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="四十九"><i>四十九</i><par n="个__num"/></e>
<e lm="址"><i>址</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
<e lm="复合"><i>复合</i><par n="平__adj"/></e>
<e lm="大洋洲"><i>大洋洲</i><par n="爱人__np"/></e>
<e lm="她们"><i>她们</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="如其"><i>如其</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="就"><i>就</i><par n="以上__pr"/></e>
<e lm="帮办"><i>帮办</i><par n="爱人__np"/></e>
<e lm="弹道"><i>弹道</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
<e lm="总"><i>总</i><par n="平__adj"/></e>
<e lm="或者"><i>或者</i><par n="并且__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="才"><i>才</i><par n="暗暗__adv"/></e>
<e lm="撤离"><i>撤离</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="整个"><i>整个</i><par n="这__det"/></e>
<e lm="本身"><i>本身</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="民用"><i>民用</i><par n="平__adj"/></e>
<e lm="热烈欢迎"><i>热烈欢迎</i><par n="爱人__np"/></e>
<e lm="特征"><i>特征</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
<e lm="直到"><i>直到</i><par n="以上__pr"/></e>
<e lm="相互"><i>相互</i><par n="暗暗__adv"/></e>
<e lm="筹措"><i>筹措</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="而且"><i>而且</i><par n="并且__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="该"><i>该</i><par n="这__det"/></e>
<e lm="贯彻执行"><i>贯彻执行</i><par n="爱人__np"/></e>
<e lm="通晓"><i>通晓</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="通知"><i>通知</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
<e lm="随着"><i>随着</i><par n="以上__pr"/></e>
<e lm="非常"><i>非常</i><par n="暗暗__adv"/></e>
<e lm="顽固"><i>顽固</i><par n="平__adj"/></e>
<e lm="沿海"><i>沿海</i><par n="x__n"/></e>
<e lm="比 以前 更"><i>比 以前 更</i><par n="x__det"/></e>
<e lm="几 个"><i>几 个</i><par n="x__det"/></e>
<e lm="的话"><i>的话</i><par n="x__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="上"><i>上</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
<e lm="对于"><i>对于</i><par n="x__pr"/></e>
<e lm="不能"><i>不能</i><par n="不能__vbmodneg"/></e>
<e lm="特约"><i>特约</i><par n="x__adj"/></e>
<e lm="不会"><i>不会</i><par n="找不到__vblexneg"/></e>
<e lm="不可"><i>不能</i><par n="不能__vbmodneg"/></e>
 <e lm="或 "><i>或 </i><par n="x__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="由于"><i>由于</i><par n="x__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="正如"><i>正如</i><par n="x__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="每 生 每"><i>每 生 每</i><par n="x__adv"/></e>
<e lm="所有"><i>所有</i><par n="x__predet"/></e>
          <e><par n="separa"/></e>
         <e><par n="coma"/></e>
         <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
